Louisiana, session 2026, HB277.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part VI-C of Chapter 20 of Title 37 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 37:1742.11, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART VI-C. DISCLOSURE OF PRESCRIPTION DRUG PRICE INFORMATION
§1742.11. Disclosure of prescription drug price information; educational or
marketing materials; minimum content; violations
A. Any person providing educational or marketing materials regarding a
prescription drug to a healthcare provider with the intent that the provider may
prescribe the drug for use by his patients shall include price information in the
materials and disclose if there is a biosimilar or generic drug available for the same
disease state.
B. The price information required by this Section shall include at a minimum
all of the following:
(1) The date that the educational or marketing materials were prepared.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-778 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 277
(2)(a) The average wholesale acquisition cost of a thirty-day supply of the
drug described in the materials.
(b) If the described drug is designed to be administered for a duration of
therapy less than thirty days, the proposed duration and average wholesale price for
that period of time.
C. A violation of the provisions of this Section shall constitute a prohibited
practice under the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, R.S.
51:1401 et seq., and shall be subject to the enforcement provisions of that Chapter.